North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 2. Local Administration.

Part 1. Local Health Departments.

§ 130A-34.
Provision of local public health services.

A county shall provide public health services.

A county shall operate a county health department, establish a consolidated human services agency pursuant to

G.S. 153A-77

, participate in a district health department, or contract with the State for the provision of public health services.

History.
1901, c. 245, s. 3; Rev., s. 4444; 1911, c. 62, s. 9; C.S., s. 7604; 1931, c. 149; 1941, c. 185; 1945, c. 99; c. 1030, s. 2; 1947, c. 474, s. 3; 1951, c. 92; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1963, c. 359; 1967, c. 1224, s. 1; 1969,
c. 719, s. 1; 1971, c. 175, s. 1; 1973, c. 137, s. 1; c. 1151; 1975, c. 272; 1979, c. 621; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 690, s. 13.

Local Modification to Former G.S. 130-13 and Former Similar Provisions.

Caldwell: 1939, c. 366; Cumberland: 1935, c. 159; 1943, c. 91; Edgecombe: 1969, c. 422; Moore: 1943, c. 326, s. 2; Nash: 1949, c. 6, s. 1.

Pilot Process for Local Health Departments.

Session Laws 2004-124, ss. 10.28B(a)-(g), provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services shall expand the pilot accreditation process for local health departments to include additional counties.

“(b) The Pilot Accreditation Advisory Board (hereafter ‘Advisory Board’) is established within the North Carolina Institute for Public Health. The Advisory Board shall be composed of 15 members appointed by the Secretary of Health and Human Services as
follows:

“(1) Four shall be county commissioners recommended by the North Carolina Association of County Commissioners, and four shall be members of a local board of health as recommended by the North Carolina Association of Local Boards of Health.

“(2) Two local health directors.

“(3) One staff member from the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health.

“(4) Three members at large.

“(5) One recommended by the Secretary of Environment and Natural Resources, from the Division of Environmental Health [now abolished].

“(c) Members of the Advisory Board who are not officers or employees of the State shall receive reimbursement for travel and subsistence expenses at the rates specified in

G.S. 138-5

. Members of the Advisory Board who are officers or employees of the State shall receive reimbursement for travel and subsistence at the rate set out in

G.S. 138-6

.

“(d) The Advisory Board shall evaluate the Department’s pilot accreditation process for local health departments, including the following:

“(1) The standards by which the pilot local health departments are judged.

“(2) The self-assessment process used by the pilot counties.

“(3) The process for local site reviews and appeals.

“(4) The makeup of the proposed State accrediting entity and its relationship to the Department.

“(5) The cost of meeting the accreditation standards in the pilot counties.

“(e) Of the funds appropriated in this act to the Department of Health and Human Services the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for the 2004-2005 fiscal year shall be allocated for administrative costs and for activities of the Pilot Accreditation
Advisory Board for the accreditation of additional local health departments. The Department shall contract with the Institute for Public Health, which shall be responsible for implementation of the pilot accreditation process.

“(f) Not later than April 1, 2005, the Pilot Accreditation Advisory Board shall report its findings to the Director of the Institute for Public Health, the Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services, and the cochairs of the House and Senate
Appropriations Committees for Health and Human Services.

“(g) The North Carolina Public Health Task Force 2004 shall continue its work on the Public Health Improvement Plan and in its final report to the General Assembly shall include comparisons of the recommendations of the Task Force with the Model State
Public Health Act, Public Health Statute Modernization National Excellence Collaborative, September 2003.”

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 6.24, provides for the development and implementation of a School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative. See note at

G.S. 115C-105.20

.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 10.15(a)-(f), provides: “(a) School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative Established.

“(1) Purpose and duties. — There is established the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative. The purpose of the Initiative is to identify and coordinate appropriate community services and supports for children at risk of school failure or out-of-home
placement in order to address the physical, social, legal, emotional, and developmental factors that affect academic performance. The Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Public Instruction, the State Board of
Education, the Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention [now the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety], the Administrative Office of the Courts, and other State agencies that provide services
for children shall share responsibility and accountability to improve outcomes for these children and their families. The Initiative shall be based on the following principles:

“a. The development of a strong infrastructure of interagency collaboration.

“b. One child, one team, one plan.

“c. Individualized, strengths-based care.

“d. Accountability.

“e. Cultural competence.

“f. Children at risk of school failure or out-of-home placement may enter the system through any participating agency.

“g. Services shall be specified, delivered, and monitored through a unified Child and Family Plan that is outcome-oriented and evaluation-based.

“h. Services shall be the most efficient in terms of cost and effectiveness and shall be delivered in the most natural settings possible.

“i. Out-of-home placements for children shall be a last resort and shall include concrete plans to bring the children back to a stable permanent home, their schools, and their community.

“j. Families and consumers shall be involved in decision making throughout service planning, delivery, and monitoring.

“(2) Program goals and services. — In order to ensure that children receiving services are appropriately served, the affected State and local agencies shall do the following:

“a. Increase capacity in the school setting to address the academic, health, mental health, social, and legal needs of children.

“b. Ensure that children receiving services are screened initially to identify needs and assessed periodically to determine progress and sustained improvement in educational, health, safety, behavioral, and social outcomes.

“c. Develop uniform screening mechanisms and a set of outcomes that are shared across affected agencies to measure children’s progress in home, school, and community settings.

“d. Promote practices that are known to be effective based upon research or national best practice standards.

“e. Review services provided across affected State agencies to ensure that children’s needs are met.

“f. Eliminate cost-shifting and facilitate cost-sharing among governmental agencies with respect to service development, service delivery, and monitoring for participating children and their families.

“g. Participate in a local memorandum of agreement signed annually by the participating superintendent of the local LEA, directors of the county departments of social services and health, director of the local management entity, the chief district court
judge, and the chief district court counselor.

“(3) Local level responsibilities. — In coordination with the North Carolina Child and Family Leadership Council (Council), established in subsection (b) of this section, the local board of education shall establish the School-Based Child and Family Team
Initiative at designated schools and shall appoint the Child and Family Team Leaders, who shall be a school nurse and a school social worker. Each local management entity that has any selected schools in its catchment area shall appoint
a Care Coordinator, and any department of social services that has a selected school in its catchment area shall appoint a Child and Family Teams Facilitator. The Care Coordinators and Child and Family Team Facilitators shall have
as their sole responsibility working with the selected schools in their catchment areas and shall provide training to school-based personnel, as required. The Child and Family Team Leaders shall identify and screen children who are
potentially at risk of academic failure or out-of-home placement due to physical, social, legal, emotional, or developmental factors. Based on the screening results, responsibility for developing, convening, and implementing the Child
and Family Team Initiative is as follows:

“a. School personnel shall take the lead role for those children and their families whose primary unmet needs are related to academic achievement.

“b. The local management entity shall take the lead role for those children and their families whose primary unmet needs are related to mental health, substance abuse, or developmental disabilities and who meet the criteria for the target population established
by the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services.

“c. The local department of public health shall take the lead role for those children and their families whose primary unmet needs are health-related.

“d. Local departments of social services shall take the lead for those children and their families whose primary unmet needs are related to child welfare, abuse, or neglect.

“e. The chief district court counselor shall take the lead for those children and their families whose primary unmet needs are related to juvenile justice issues. A representative from each named or otherwise identified publicly supported children’s agency
shall participate as a member of the Team as needed. Team members shall coordinate, monitor, and assure the successful implementation of a unified Child and Family Plan.

“(4) Reporting requirements. — School-Based Child and Family Team Leaders shall provide data to the Council for inclusion in their report to the North Carolina General Assembly. The report shall include the following:

“a. The number of and other demographic information on children screened and assigned to a team and a description of the services needed by and provided to these children.

“b. The number of and information about children assigned to a team who are placed in programs or facilities outside the child’s home or outside the child’s county and the average length of stay in residential treatment.

“c. The amount and source of funds expended to implement the Initiative.

“d. Information on how families and consumers are involved in decision making throughout service planning, delivery, and monitoring.

“e. Other information as required by the Council to evaluate success in local programs and ensure appropriate outcomes.

“f. Recommendations on needed improvements.

“(5) Local advisory committee. — In each county with a participating school, the superintendent of the local LEA shall either identify an existing cross-agency collaborative or council or shall form a new group to serve as a local advisory committee to
work with the Initiative. Newly formed committees shall be chaired by the superintendent and one other member of the committee to be elected by the committee. The local advisory committee shall include the directors of the county departments
of social services and health; the directors of the local management entity; the chief district court judge; the chief district court counselor; the director of a school-based or school-linked health center, if a center is located
within the catchment area of the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative; and representatives of other agencies providing services to children, as designated by the Committee. The members of the Committee shall meet as needed
to monitor and support the successful implementation of the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative. The Local Child and Family Team Advisory Committee may designate existing cross-agency collaboratives or councils as working
groups or to provide assistance in accomplishing established goals.

“(b) North Carolina Child and Family Leadership Council. —

“(1) Leadership Council established; location. — There is established the North Carolina Child and Family Leadership Council (Council). The Council shall be located within the Department of Administration for organizational and budgetary purposes.

“(2) Purpose. — The purpose of the Council is to review and advise the Governor in the development of the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative and to ensure the active participation and collaboration in the Initiative by all State agencies and
their local counterparts providing services to children in participating counties in order to increase the academic success of and reduce out-of-home and out-of-county placements of children at risk of academic failure.

“(3) Membership. — The Superintendent of Public Instruction and the Secretary of Health and Human Services shall serve as cochairs of the Council. Council membership shall include the Secretary of the Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention
[now the Secretary of Public Safety], the Chair of the State Board of Education, the Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts, and other members as appointed by the Governor.

“(4) The Council shall do the following:

“a. Sign an annual memorandum of agreement (MOA) among the named State agencies to define the purposes of the program and to ensure that program goals are accomplished.

“b. Resolve State policy issues, as identified at the local level, which interfere with effective implementation of the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative.

“c. Direct the integration of resources, as needed, to meet goals and ensure that the Initiative promotes the most effective and efficient use of resources and eliminates duplication of effort.

“d. Establish criteria for defining success in local programs and ensure appropriate outcomes.

“e. Develop an evaluation process, based on expected outcomes, to ensure the goals and objectives of this Initiative are achieved.

“f. Review progress made on integrating policies and resources across State agencies, reaching expected outcomes, and accomplishing other goals.

“g. Report semiannually, on January 1 and July 1, on progress made and goals achieved to the Office of the Governor, the Joint Appropriations Committees and Subcommittees on Education, Justice and Public Safety, and Health and Human Services, and the
Fiscal Research Division of the Legislative Services Office. The Council may designate existing cross-agency collaboratives or councils as working groups or to provide assistance in accomplishing established goals.

“(c) Department of Health and Human Services. — The Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services shall ensure that all agencies within the Department collaborate in the development and implementation of the School-Based Child and Family Team
Initiative and provide all required support to ensure that the Initiative is successful.

“(d) Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention. — The Secretary of the Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention shall ensure that all agencies within the Department collaborate in the development and implementation of
the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative and provide all required support to ensure that the Initiative is successful.

“(e) Administrative Office of the Courts. — The Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts shall ensure that the Office collaborates in the development and implementation of the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative and shall provide
all required support to ensure that the Initiative is successful.

“(f) Department of Public Instruction. — The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall ensure that the Department collaborates in the development and implementation of the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative and shall provide all required support
to ensure that the Initiative is successful.”

Session Laws 2009-451, s. 10.26(a)-(i), provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) shall develop a five-year Public Health Improvement Plan (Plan) by March 31, 2010. In developing the Plan the Secretary shall:

“(1) Adopt a list of services and activities performed by local health departments that qualify as core public health functions of statewide significance.

“(2) Adopt a list of performance measures with the intent of improving health status indicators applicable to core public health functions of statewide significance that local health departments (LHDs) must provide.

“(3) Identify a set of health status indicators to be given priority by LHDs.

“Under the Plan, all priorities and health status indicators must incorporate as an essential activity the disparity of diseases amongst populations and locales.

“(b) In order for measurable benefits to be realized through the implementation of the Plan, the Plan shall include the adoption of levels of performance necessary to promote:

“(1) Uniformity across local health departments,

“(2) Best evidence-based services,

“(3) National standards of performance,

“(4) Innovations in public health practice, and

“(5) Reduction of geographic and racial health disparities.

“LHDs shall have the flexibility and opportunity to use the resources available to achieve the required performance measures in a manner that best suits the LHD.

“(c) The Plan will address the need to provide county health departments with financial incentives to encourage and increase local investment in public health functions. County governments shall not supplant existing local funding with State incentive
resources. The Secretary may revise the list of activities and performance measures as appropriate, but before doing so, the Secretary shall provide a written explanation of the rationale for the addition, deletion, or revision.

“(d) In developing the Plan the Secretary shall establish and chair the Public Health Improvement Plan Task Force (Task Force), the members and expertise of which shall include:

“(1) Local health departments,

“(2) Department staff,

“(3) Individuals and entities with expertise in the development of performance measures, accountability, and systems management,

“(4) Experts in development of evidence-based medical guidelines or public health practice guidelines, and

“(5) Individuals and entities that will be affected by the performance measures.

“(e) The implementation schedule for the Plan shall be as follows:

“(1) July 1, 2009, establish the Task Force to develop the Plan,

“(2) March 31, 2010, submit the Plan to the 2010 Regular Session of the 2009 General Assembly,

“(3) July 1, 2010, implement the Plan, and

“(4) November 15, 2011, and annually thereafter, report on Plan implementation.

“(f) The Department will identify the programmatic activities and funding in the Division of Public Health associated with the core functions and activities in the Plan. Funds associated with these activities shall be subject to a flexible spending formula
adopted by the Department, as follows:

“(1) Beginning in SFY 2010-2011, the flexible spending formula will begin to replace the current spending with a more effective method of funding public health activities at the local level and achieving the results expected.

“(2) The Task Force shall identify a reliable and consistent source of State revenue to fund the flexible spending formula.

“(3) If sufficient additional revenue is available to implement the Plan, a separate set-aside of available funds would be created. This set-aside would be available to contiguous LHDs that seek to address a specific women’s health, child health, or adult
health disease or chronic condition, and in doing so, choose to merge into a single Local Health District, thus saving administrative dollars to be focused on public health issues.

“(g) Funds appropriated to the Department for flexible spending shall be distributed to county health departments as follows:

“(1) Each of the county health departments will receive a base amount to be determined by the DHHS.

“(2) The balance of funds in the Flexible Spending Account is to be distributed to the counties on the basis of a formula that takes into consideration the following elements:

“a. Population,

“b. Per capita income,

“c. Rates of:

“1. Infant mortality,

“2. Teenage pregnancy,

“3. Tobacco use,

“4. Cancer,

“5. Heart disease,

“6. Diabetes, and

“7. Stroke.

“d. Percent of minorities in the county,

“e. Body Mass Index (BMI) of public school students, and

“f. Other factors as the Secretary may find necessary to achieve the goals of the Plan.

“(3) The use of the funds by the LHD would reflect the core public health functions. It will be incumbent upon the LHD to use the funds in a manner that assures its achievement of the performance measures adopted by the Secretary.

“(h) To ensure compliance with Department directives, the Task Force shall consider requiring each county health department to submit to the Secretary such data as the Secretary determines is necessary to allow the Secretary to assess whether the county
health department has used the funds in a manner consistent with achieving the performance measures associated with this Plan.

“(i) Beginning November 15, 2011, and biannually thereafter, the Secretary shall report to the Governor and the General Assembly on:

“(1) The distribution of funds to LHDs,

“(2) The use of these funds by LHDs,

“(3) The specific effect the funding from this Plan has had on:

“a. LHDs’ performance,

“b. Health status indicators, and

“c. Health disparities.

“The Secretary’s initial report will focus on implementation. Subsequent reports will evaluate trends in performance and expenditures.”

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 12H.30, as added by Session Laws 2015-264, s. 89, provides: “The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance, shall submit a Medicaid State Plan amendment request to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services (CMS) to amend the annual cost settlement methodology for local health departments, as defined in Article 2 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes. The State Plan amendment shall provide a methodology that maximizes identification
of allowable Medicaid costs in order to assure that North Carolina is receiving the maximum federal reimbursement for local health departments’ treatment of Medicaid-eligible patients consistent with Medicare reimbursement principles.
The State Plan amendment required by this section shall not be subject to the 90-day prior submission requirement of

G.S. 108A-54.1

A(e) but shall be submitted by February 15, 2016 and shall apply to cost reports with a fiscal year beginning July 1, 2016 and thereafter. This section shall not be construed to require the Department to submit to CMS
a State Plan amendment that increases State funding requirements.”

§ 130A-34.1.
Accreditation of local health departments; board established.

The Local Health Department Accreditation Board is established within the North Carolina Institute for Public Health. The Board shall be composed of 17 members appointed by the Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services as follows:

Four shall be county commissioners recommended by the North Carolina Association of County Commissioners, and four shall be members of a local board of health as recommended by the Association of North Carolina Boards of Health.

Three local health directors.

Three staff members from the Division of Public Health, Department of Health and Human Services.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.3(zz), effective July 1, 2011.

Three at large.

Members shall serve four-year terms except that initial terms shall be staggered such that three members are appointed for one year, four members are appointed for two years, four members are appointed for three years, and six members are appointed for
four years. An appointment to fill a vacancy on the Board created by the resignation, dismissal, ineligibility, death, or disability of any member shall be made for the balance of the unexpired term. The Secretary may remove any
member for misfeasance, malfeasance, or nonfeasance. The chair shall be designated by the Secretary and shall designate the times and places at which the Board shall meet. The Board shall meet as often as necessary to carry out
its duty to develop and review periodically accreditation standards, to engage in activities necessary to assign accreditation status to local health departments, and to engage in other activities necessary to implement this section.

Members of the Board who are not officers or employees of the State shall receive reimbursement for travel and subsistence expenses at the rates specified in

G.S. 138-5

. Members of the Board who are officers or employees of the State shall receive reimbursement for travel and subsistence at the rate set out in

G.S. 138-6

.

The Board shall assign an accreditation status to each local health department that applies for initial accreditation, reaccreditation, or relief from conditional accreditation. The Board shall assign the appropriate accreditation status, as follows:

Accredited, which means that the local health department has satisfied the accreditation standards adopted by the Board and applicable rules adopted by the Commission.

Conditionally accredited, which means that the local health department has failed to meet one or more accreditation standards and has therefore been granted short-term accreditation subject to conditions specified by the Board.

Unaccredited, which means that the local health department has continued to fail to meet one or more accreditation standards after a period of conditional accreditation.

The Commission shall, after reviewing standards developed by and consulting with the Board, adopt rules establishing accreditation standards for local health departments. The accreditation standards shall include at least all of the following:

An accreditation process that consists of the following components:

A self-assessment conducted by the local health department seeking accreditation.

A site visit by a team of experts to clarify, verify, and amplify the information in the self-assessment.

Final action by the Board on the local health department’s accreditation status.

The local health department’s capacity to provide the essential public health services, as follows:

Monitoring health status to identify community health problems.

Diagnosing and investigating health hazards in the community.

Informing, educating, and empowering people about health issues.

Mobilizing community partnerships to identify and solve health problems.

Developing policies and plans that support individual and community health efforts.

Enforcing laws and regulations that protect health and ensure safety.

Linking people to needed personal health care services and assuring the provision of health care when otherwise unavailable.

Assuring a competent public health workforce and personal health care workforce.

Evaluating effectiveness, accessibility, and quality of personal and population-based health services.

Conducting research.

The local health department’s facilities and administration.

The local health department’s staff competencies and training procedures or programs.

The local health department’s governance and fiscal management; and

Informal procedures for reviewing Board decisions.

All local health departments shall obtain and maintain accreditation in accordance with this section. The Board shall implement accreditation over a period of eight years, beginning January 1, 2006. The Board shall establish a schedule specifying when
each local health department shall apply for initial accreditation and ensuring that all local health departments have applied for initial accreditation by December 1, 2014.

The Board shall assign the following accreditation status, as applicable:

“Accredited” to a local health department that satisfies the accreditation standards. The initial period of accreditation shall expire four calendar years after initial accreditation is granted.

“Conditionally accredited” to a local health department that, in its initial accreditation application, fails to satisfy the accreditation standards. The period of conditional accreditation shall expire two calendar years after conditional accreditation
is granted. The Board shall provide to the local health department a written statement of the conditions that must be satisfied in order for the local health department to be accredited. At any time during the two-year
period, the local health department may request that its status be reviewed and changed from “conditionally accredited” to “accredited.” If the Board finds that the conditions have been met, the Board shall change the local
health department’s status to “accredited” with the accreditation period to expire four calendar years after the conditional accreditation was initially granted. If the Board finds that the conditions have not been satisfied,
the local health department shall continue under its grant of conditional accreditation. During the conditional accreditation period, the local health department may apply again for accreditation in accordance with rules
adopted by the Commission.

Each accredited local health department shall apply for reaccreditation in accordance with rules adopted by the Commission.

When the Board assigns the status “unaccredited” to a local health department, the Board shall send written notification of that status to the local health department and to the Secretary.

The Commission shall adopt rules to implement this section.

History.
2005-369, s. 1(b); 2011-145, s. 13.3(zz).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.3(zz), effective July 1, 2011, substituted “Three staff members” for “Two staff members” in subdivision (a)(3); and deleted subdivision (a)(4), which read: “One staff member from the Division of Environmental Health, recommended
by the Secretary of Environment and Natural Resources.”

§ 130A-34.2.
Billing of Medicaid.

Local health departments, district health departments, and consolidated human services agencies shall have the following two options to bill public health program services to Medicaid:

Submit claim data to HIS and manage 837/835 billing files within HIS.

Submit claim data to any approved Medicaid clearinghouse and manage 837/835 billing files within that system.

The Division of Public Health may require local health departments, district health departments, and consolidated human services agencies, regardless of how those entities choose to bill public health program services to Medicaid, to submit aggregate
data to the Division of Public Health. These data shall be provided in a format specified by the Division of Public Health.

Local health departments, district health departments, and consolidated human services agencies shall make available encounter-level data for the Division of Public Health as necessary to comply with federal grant reporting requirements. These data shall
be provided in a format specified by the Division of Public Health. However, local health departments shall not be required to use Common Name Data System (CNDS) for any purpose.

Local health departments, district health departments, and consolidated human services agencies that bill services through a Medicaid clearinghouse shall be entitled to the same reimbursement rates negotiated for agencies classified as public health entities
and the same Medicaid cost settlement reimbursement as those agencies that bill services through HIS.

The Division of Public Health shall provide aggregate data requirements for the purposes of Medicaid cost study reimbursement on behalf of the local health departments, district health departments, and consolidated human services agencies that choose
to bill services through a Medicaid clearinghouse. Those local health departments, district health departments, and consolidated human services agencies shall submit to the Division of Public Health the data required for the purposes
of Medicaid cost study reimbursement and shall retain responsibility to supply the Division of Health Benefits and/or Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) documentation to support audit processes and procedures to confirm
and validate cost study reimbursement data, as defined by CMS cost find regulations.

As used in this section, unless otherwise specified, the following definitions apply:

“Aggregate data” means high-level reports about services provided by local health departments, district health departments, and consolidated human services agencies, such as the number of patients meeting particular criteria served by a health department
or consolidated human service agency or the count of and dollars received for each particular service being performed by a health department or consolidated human service agency, by funding source program and appropriate
service code and that comply with appropriate State and federal regulations.

“Encounter-level data” means patient-identified data specific to each medical encounter used to bill medical services.

“Health Information System” or “HIS” means the system operated by the North Carolina Division of Public Health and used by local health departments to record information about services the local health departments provide.

“Public health program services” means services normally provided by a local health department under agreements with the Division of Public Health or the Division of Health Benefits.

History.
2011-90, s. 1; 2019-81, s. 15(a).

§ 130A-34.3.
Incentive program for public health improvement.

In order to promote efficiency and effectiveness of the public health delivery system, the Department shall establish a Public Health Improvement Incentive Program. The Program shall provide monetary incentives for the creation and expansion of multicounty
local health departments serving a population of not less than 75,000.

The Commission shall adopt rules to implement the Public Health Improvement Incentive Program.

History.
2012-126, s. 3.

§ 130A-34.4.
Strengthening local public health infrastructure.

By July 1, 2014, in order for a local health department to be eligible to receive State and federal public health funding from the Division of Public Health, the following criteria shall be met:

A local health department shall obtain and maintain accreditation pursuant to

G.S. 130A-34.1

.

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-246, s. 20, effective July 1, 2016.

The criteria established in subsection (a) of this section shall be in addition to any other funding criteria established by State or federal law.

History.
2012-126, s. 3; 2015-246, s. 2.5(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-246, s. 2.5(a), effective July 1, 2016, deleted subdivision (a)(2) which read: “The county or counties comprising the local health department shall maintain operating appropriations to local health departments from local ad valorem tax
receipts at levels equal to amounts appropriated in State fiscal year 2010-2011.”